tests/verbs-TAI.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : mpahkuna
    pah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : mpahkunanak
    winewam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : newinewamkuna
    winewam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : newinewamkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nalkwenkuna
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nalkwenkunanak
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nteluxolkuna
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nteluxolkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpahkuna
    pah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpahkunanak
    winewam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kewinewamkuna
    winewam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kewinewamkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kenalkwenkuna
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kenalkwenkunanak
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kteluxolkuna
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kteluxolkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpahkuwa
    pah<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpahkuwaok
    winewam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewinewamkuwa
    winewam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kewinewamkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kenalkwenkuwa
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kenalkwenkuwaok
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kteluxolkuwa
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kteluxolkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 7) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    pah<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : pahkuwoo
    winewam<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : winewamkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 8) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    nalkwen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : nalkwenkuwoo
    eluxol<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : eluxolkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntelapehwakw
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntelapehwkuk
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkelaphatunakw
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkelaphatunkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nshinkalakw
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nshinkalkuk
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : notumukw
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : notumkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktelapehwakw
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktelapehwkuk
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kelaphatunakw
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kelaphatunkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kshinkalakw
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kshinkalkuk
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kenotumukw
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kenutomkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : elapehwku
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : elapehwku
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : kelaphatunku
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : kelaphatunku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : shinkalku
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : shinkalku
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : notumku
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : notumku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntelapehwkuna
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntelapehwkunanak
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkelaphatunkuna
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkelaphatunkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nshinkalkuna
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nshinkalkunanak
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : notumakuna
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : notumakunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : ktelapehwkuna
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : ktelapehwkunanak
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kelaphatunkuna
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kelaphatunkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kshinkalkuna
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kshinkalkunanak
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kenotumkuna
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kenotumkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktelapehwkuwa
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : ktelapehwkuwaok
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kelaphatunkunkuwa
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kelaphatunkunkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kshinkalkuwa
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kshinkalkuwaok
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kenotumkuwa
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kenotumkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 9) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    elapehw<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : elapehwkuwoo
    kelaphatun<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : kelaphatunkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 10) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    shinkal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : shinkalkuwoo
    notum<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : notumkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : mpeshuwakw
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : mpeshukuk
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkiskakw
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkiskkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nemathakalakw
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nemathakalkuk
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : mpemetunhalakw
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : mpemetunhalkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kpeshuwakw
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpeshukuk
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kiskakw
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kiskkuk
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kemathakalakw
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kemathakalkuk
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kpemetunhalakw
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpemetunhalkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : peshuku
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : peshuku
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : kiskku
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : kiskku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : mathakalku
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : mathakalku
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : pemetunhalku
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : pemetunhalku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : mpeshukuna
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : mpeshukunanak
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkiskkuna
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkiskkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nemathakalkuna
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nemathakalkunanak
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : mpemetunhalkuna
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : mpemetunhalkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpeshukuna
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpeshukunanak
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kiskkuna
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kiskkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kemathakalkuna
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kemathakalkunanak
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpemetunhalkuna
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpemetunhalkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpeshukuwa
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpeshukuwaok
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kiskkuwa
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kiskkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpeshukuwa
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpeshukuwaok
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kiskkuwa
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kiskkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 11) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    peshu<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : peshukuwoo
    kisk<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : kiskkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 12) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    mathakal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : mathakalkuwoo
    pemetunhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : pemetunhalkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 13) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    nekal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nekalakw
    nekal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nekalkuk
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : noxkumakw
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : noxkumkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 14) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : natuxtakw
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : natuxtkuk
    tuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntuxtakw
    tuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntuxtkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 13) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    nekal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : nekalakw
    nekal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : nekalkuk
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : noxkumakw
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : noxkumkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 14) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : natuxtakw
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : natuxtkuk
    tuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ntuxtakw
    tuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ntuxtkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 13) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    nekal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : nekalku
    nekal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : nekalku
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : noxkumku
    noxkum<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : noxkumku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 14) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : natuxtku
    natuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : natuxtku
    tuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : tuxtku
    tuxt<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : tuxtku
